Massachusetts, session 194th, S469.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17 of chapter 19D of the general laws is hereby amended by
inserting in line nine, after the phrase “secretary of health and human services or his designee,”
the following: “the speaker of the house or his designee, the senate president or her designee.”
SECTION 2. Section 17 of chapter 19D of the general laws is hereby amended by
striking in line ten the word: - “three,” and inserting in place thereof, the word: “five.”
SECTION 3. Section 17 of chapter 19D of the general laws is hereby amended by
inserting in line eleven, after the words “consumer interests,” the following: one of whom shall
be a representative of the Massachusetts Assisted Living Association, Inc. and one of whom shall
be a representative of Leading Age,”
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 17 of chapter 19D of the general laws is hereby amended by
striking in lines fourteen and fifteen: - “of one year each,” and inserting in place thereof, the
words: “- coterminous with the governor. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment for the remainder of any unexpired term."
of 2